District of Columbia statutes.
16-541

Definition and applicability.

As used in this subchapter, “judgment” includes an unconditional decree for the payment of money, and this subchapter is applicable to such a decree.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 552, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Child support enforcement, income withholding, see § 46-208.
Fraudulent conveyances, remedies of creditors, see § 28-3107.
Superior Court of the District of Columbia, jurisdiction, see § 11-921.
1981 Ed., § 16-541.
1973 Ed., § 16-541.